src/phonology/fkv-phon.twolc
!! !!!Phonological rules for Kven
!! !!Alphabet

Alphabet
a b c d đ ð e f g h i j k l m n o p q         !!= * @CODE@
r s t u ü v w x y z å ä ö æ ø š             !!= * @CODE@
A B C D Đ Ð E F G H I J K L M N O P           !!= * @CODE@
R S T U V W X Y Z Å Ä Ö Æ Ø Š               !!= * @CODE@
%^A:ä %^O:ö %^U:y                !!= * @CODE@ archi vowels for harmony
%^V %^N:n                        !!= * @CODE@ vowel copy sanoo, LNR copy purra
i2:i  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = plural i of nouns
i3:i  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = past tense i of verbs
i4:i  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = i in conditional isi of most verbs (without gemination)
i5:i  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = superlative i of adjectives
i6:i  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = i:j in poika:pojan
i7:i  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ = i in conditional of contract verbs (with gemination)
p2:p t2:t k2:k            !!= * @CODE@ p2, k2, t2 = always p, t, k ; eli ei tule astevaihtelua
k3:k                      !!= * @CODE@ k3 never k:v, contrary to k
%^HMETA:0                 !!= * @CODE@ h metateesi sykshyyn
%^WG:0                    !!= * @CODE@ weak grade hatun
%^TJ:0                    !!≈ * @CODE@ vuote vuoje
%^T0:0                    !!≈ * @CODE@ tytär tyär tytärtä tyärtä in Var
%^UU:0                    !!≈ * @CODE@ vuote vuue
%^E2I:0                   !!= * @CODE@ e to i in nom ove : ovi
%^A2I:0                   !!= * @CODE@ a to i in opettajine (Var)
%^VDEL:0 %^EDEL:0         !!= * @CODE@ -- DEL = deletion
%^AE:0                    !!= * @CODE@ -- a to e lauletaan, soma somempi
%^AO:0                    !!= * @CODE@ -- a to o sanoissa
%^A0:0                    !!= * @CODE@ -- a to 0
%^I0:0                    !!= * @CODE@ -- i to 0 in vanha_x_21 -Por with i endings: tooline
%^E0:0                    !!≈ * @CODE@ e to 0 in vanha_a_32 and vanha_n_32 bc we add b4 dial trigger, for twolc struc.
%^Por:0                   !!= * @CODE@ -f- Porsanger  dialekti
%^Var:0                   !!= * @CODE@ -- Varanger   dialekti
%^Jok:0                   !!= * @CODE@ -- Jokivarret dialekti
%^End:0                   !!= * @CODE@ -- End of word, since the # tags don't work properly
%^¤:0
!!!*** Remember to add new tags to Dummy further down!
!%^n_23-e2i:0          ! Not in dummy

! Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries further down):
 »7     ! »
 «7     ! «
 %[%>%] ! >
 %[%<%] ! <

 »  !!= * @CODE@ = Derivational suffix
%>  !!= * @CODE@ = border before inflection suffix
 #  !! The hash mark = Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ !!= * @CODE@ = (exceptional) soft hyphenation point 

;


!! !!Sets
Sets
FrontVow = e i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 y ä ö ü æ ø ;            !!= * @CODE@
BackVow = a o u å ;                                       !!= * @CODE@
ArchiVow =  %^A %^O %^U ;                                 !!= * @CODE@
UnroundedVow = e ä a i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 ;                !!= * @CODE@
RoundedVow = y ö u o ;                                    !!= * @CODE@
SomeVow = %^V ;                                           !!= * @CODE@
NeutralVow = e i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 ;                      !!= * @CODE@
Vow   = FrontVow BackVow ArchiVow SomeVow ;       !!= * @CODE@
NotE    =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 y ä ö ü æ ø a o u å ;       !!= * @CODE@
NotEY   =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7   ä ö   æ ø a o u å ;       !!= * @CODE@
NotEYU  =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7   ä ö   æ ø a o   å ;       !!= * @CODE@
NotOU   = e i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7 y ä ö ü æ ø a ;             !!= * @CODE@
NotOUI  = e                     y ä ö ü æ ø a ;             !!= * @CODE@
NotOUIY = e                       ä ö   æ ø a ;             !!= * @CODE@
NotAEI  =                       y ä ö ü æ ø   o u å ;       !!= * @CODE@
NotOUIF =                      y ä ö ü æ ø   ;              !!= * @CODE@ and e? (removed 29.1.)
NotOUIB =                                  a ;              !!= * @CODE@ and e? (removed 29.1.)
NotEYUF =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7   ä ö   æ ø         ;       !!= * @CODE@
NotEYUB =   i i2 i3 i4 i5 i6 i7             a o   å ;       !!= * @CODE@
LNRM     = l n r m ;
ArchiCns = %^N ;                                            !!= * @CODE@
SurfaceCns = b c d đ f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x z ;  !!= * @CODE@
Cns = SurfaceCns ArchiCns p2 t2 k2 ;                        !!= * @CODE@
Segment = Vow Cns ;                                       !!= * @CODE@
Dummy = %^WG %^T0 %^TJ %^UU %^E2I %^A2I %^HMETA %^VDEL %^EDEL %^AE %^AO %^¤ %^I0 %^E0 %^A0 %^Por %^Var %^Jok ;  !!= * @CODE@
DummyBorder = Dummy %> ;          !!= * @CODE@
Dial =  %^Por %^Var %^Jok ;  !!= * @CODE@
NonFront = BackVow ArchiVow ArchiCns SomeVow Cns NeutralVow Dummy %> ;  !!= * @CODE@
NE = %> n e ;
EÄA = e %^A ;

! Development principles:
! --- NO UNCLEAR SEQUENCES WITHOUT AN EXPLANATION (and TESTS): (Cns:*) :Cns+ Cns:* (:Cns)
! --- One TRIGGER, one change! No ^AO that means a:o and a:0 and a:i, then 3 DIFFERENT triggers

!! Trigger order (to be completed)
!! {{{
!! stem  Dial:  WG  [T0|TJ]  [E0|I0|E2I|A2I|AO|AE|VDEL|UU]  HMETA  >  [i2:|i3:|i4:|i5:]  >  suffixes
!! }}}

!! !!!Rules (Divided into consonant and vowel rules)
Rules

! ===============
!! !!!Consonant rules
! ===============


!! !!Gemination

!! Pitkän vokaalin jälkeen ja kans painottoman tavun jälkeen k, t, p ja s geminoituvat
!! ko perässä on pitkä vokaali (= lounaismurteitten erikoisgeminaatio),
!! mutta muut konsonantit geminoituvat vaan lyhyen painollisen tavun jälkeen
!! (= yleisgeminaatio). (ES).

"Gemination 0:h"
!! __@RULENAME@__
0:h <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ ä %> :ä ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ ö %> :ö ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ y %> :y ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ u %> [:u|i2: (%> n) #] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ e %> :e ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ :o (Dial:) [ %> :o | (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) # ] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ :o (Dial:)           (%^AO:0) %> i5: %> [m|n] ; !superlatiivi
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ :a (Dial:0) %> :a ; ! for kuvvaa Dialects could be just %^Por:0
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ [ä:|(e:)] (Dial:) (%^E2I:0) %> :i %> :i ; ! pyhä:pyhhii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _ ä: %> i5: i %> [n|m] ; ! superl. pyhhiimässä
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow h _  a:i (Dial:) (%^A2I:0) %> :i ; ! kuva kuvvii ! used2be just (Dummy:0) after a:i

"Gemination 0:j"
!! __@RULENAME@__
0:j <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ ä: (Dial:) %> [:ä | i2:i %> :i ]      ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ ö  %> :ö                              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ y  %> :y                              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ e  %> :e                              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ i (%^AO:) %> :i (%> n) #              ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ u  %> [:u|i2: (%> n) #]               ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ u  %>     i5:  %> [m|n]               ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ :a   (Dial:0)  %> :a                  ; ! for kuvvaa d. could be just %^Por:0
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ :o   (Dial:) [ %> :o | (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) # ] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ :o   (Dial:)           (%^AO:0) %> i5: %> [m|n]   ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _ (e:) (Dial:) (%^E2I:0) %> :i %> :i    ; ! kivvii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow j _  a:i (Dial:) (%^A2I:0) %> :i         ; ! kuva kuvvii !
      !  [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] j _ :ä (Dial:) %> :ä  ; !Må ikke gi lämpim^A>mp^A>^A -> lämpimä>mpä>ä
      !  [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [l|r|n|m] j _ :a (Dial:) %> :a ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :Vow (Dial:) %>  i7: ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :i   (Dial:) %>  %^V:i ; ! Added ^V:i instead of just :i. Used2Be [ %^V:i - i7: ]
                               ![l|r|n|m] :j _ e:  (Dial:) %^E2I:0 %> i2: %>   %^V: ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _  i   (Dial:) %> i2: %> t %^A: ; ! meininkkiitä in Por
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :ö (Dial:) %> :ö ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :y (Dial:) %> :y ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :u (Dial:) %> :u ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :o (Dial:) %> :o ;
                               ![l|r|n|m] j _ :e (Dial:) %> :e ;

"Gemination 0:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__
0:k <=> ([a|o]) [Vow|i6:] (Vow:) k _  :o (Dial:)  %^AO: %> [:i - i3:] (%> [n|t])     #  ; ! aikkoi  ! never a:0
        ([a|o]) [Vow|i6:] (Vow:) k _  :i (Dial:) %^A2I: %> [:i - i3:] (%> [n|t])     #  ; ! poikkii ! never a:0
        ([a|o]) Vow       (Vow:) k _ e:0 (Dial:)        %>   i2:i      %> %^V:i  (n) #  ; ! jokkii
                Vow:+       k _ Vow:           %> i2:i  %>  :i                      ; ! pena-penniin,huppiin,eilaki-lakkiin? was: %^V:i
                Vow:+       k _ e:             %> i7:i  Cns                         ; ! contr verbs
                Vow:+ [k|k2:] _ Vow:       [%> %^V:i | %^AO: %> i2: (%> n) # ]      ; ! sopi soppii
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+ [k|k2:|k3:] _ a: (%^Por:0) [%> :a | %^AO: %> i2: (%> n) #]  ; ! Only in Por, 0:k kk
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+           k _ a: (Dial:)  %^AO:  %>  i5:  %>  [m|n]         ; ! superl.
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ a  %> :a                ; ! jakkaat:jakkaa
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ ä  %> :ä                ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ ö  %> [:ö|i2: (%> n) #] ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ y  %> [:y|i2: (%> n) #] ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ u  %> [:u|:i  (%> n) #] ; ! flaku flakkui, flakkuin
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ o  %> [:o|:i  (%> n) #] ; ! koko kokkoi
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+       k _ e (Dial:) %> :e         ;
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+   [l|r|n|m]  k _ ä: (Dial:)         %> [ :ä | i2:i %> :i ]         ; ! selkä selkkii, selkkiin
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+   [l|r|n|m]  k _ ä: (Dial:)         %>  i5:  :i  %>  [m|n]         ; ! superlatiivi 
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+   [l|r|n|m]  k _ a: (Dial:)        [%> :a | %^AO: %> i2: (%> n) #] ; ! virka:virkkoi
 [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow:+   [l|r|n|m]  k _ a: (Dial:)         %^AO: %> i5: %> [m|n] ; ! superlatiivi, pimmeenarkkoiman
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :Vow (Dial:)       %>  i7:           ;
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :i (Dial:)         %>          %^V:i ; ! Added ^V:i instead of just :i. Used2Be [ %^V:i - i7: ]
                        [l|r|n|m] :k _ e: (Dial:) %^E2I:0 %> i2: %>   %^V:  ;
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _  i (Dial:)         %> i2: %> t %^A:  ; ! meininkkiitä in Por
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :ö (Dial:) %> [:ö|:i]          ;
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :y (Dial:) %> [:y|:i (%> n) #] ;
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :u (Dial:) %> [:u|:i (%> n) #] ; ! urkkui mutta urkuina
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :o (Dial:) %> [:o|:i (%> n) #] ; 
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :o (Dial:) %> i5: %> [m|n]     ; ! superl.
                        [l|r|n|m]  k _ :e (Dial:) %> [:e|:i]          ;



!!€ flak0u>i2>n
!!€ flakku>i>n
!!€ flaku>i2>n^A
!!€ flaku>i>na
!!€ urk0u>i2
!!€ urkku>i


"Gemination 0:l"
!! __@RULENAME@__
0:l <=> [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ ä %> :ä ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ ö %> :ö ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ i (Dial:) %> :i  ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ y %> [:y|i2: (%> n) #] ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ u %> [:u|i2: (%> n) #] ;
                 Cns   Vow l _ u [%> %^V: | %> i2: (%> t %^A:) #] ; ! vaihettelluu, vaihettellui
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ :o (Dial:) [ %> :o | (%^AO:0) %> i2: (%> n) # ] ; ! ala alloi, alloin (mutta ei alloina)
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ :o (Dial:)           (%^AO:0) %> i5: %> [m|n]   ; ! superlatiivi 
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ e %> :e ;
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ :a (Dial:0) %> :a ; ! for kuvvaa Dialects could be just %^Por:0
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _ (e:) (Dial:) (%^E2I:0) %> :i %> :i ; ! kivvii
        [.#.|#:] Cns:* Vow l _  a:i (Dial:) (%^A2I:0) %> :i ; ! kuva kuvvii ! used2be just (Dummy:0) after a:i
